Utah statutes.
23-21-4.   Right of access to lands for hunting, trapping, or fishing reserved to public -- Exception.

(1) Except as provided in Section 65A-2-5, there is reserved to the public the right of access to all lands owned by the state, including those lands lying below the official government meander line or high water line of navigable waters, for the purpose of hunting, trapping, or fishing.

(2) When any department or agency of the state leases or sells any lands belonging to the state of Utah lying below the official government meander line or the high water line of the navigable waters within the state, the lease, contract of sale, or deed shall contain a provision that:

(a) the lands shall be open to the public for the purpose of hunting, trapping, or fishing during the lawful season, except as provided by Section 65A-2-5; and

(b)  no charge may be made by the lessee, contractee, or grantee to any person who desires to go upon the land for the purpose of hunting, trapping, or fishing.

(3)  Lands referred to in this section shall be regulated or closed to hunting, trapping, or fishing as provided in this title for other lands and waters.

